th: สีทาชนิดต่างๆ ให้ผลลัพธ์ที่ตั้งใจไว้: การยึดเกาะ/การเชื่อมต่อ; เอฟเฟกต์สีแตก; ตัวเร่งการแห้ง; ตัวชะลอการแห้ง; การไหล/การปรับระดับ; การเคลือบเงา/ความโปร่งใส; เพิ่มความมัน/ความเงางาม; พื้นผิวทราย/กรวด; ด้าน/เรียบ; ประกายมุก/สีเหลือบ; การเท/การเกิดเซลล์; พื้นผิว/การสร้างชั้นสี (อิมพาสโต); การป้องกันรังสี UV; วานิช/การปกป้อง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 繪畫媒材預期效果: 黏著/接著; 裂紋效果; 乾燥加速劑; 乾燥延緩劑; 流動/流平; 罩染/透明; 增加光澤/亮度; 粗砂/沙子紋理; 霧面/消光; 珠光/虹彩; 澆注/細胞效果; 紋理/堆疊 (厚塗); 紫外線防護; 凡尼斯/防護; 其他
en: Paint medium intended effect: Adhesion/bonding; Crackle effect; Drying accelerator; Drying retarder; Flow/leveling; Glazing/transparency; Gloss/shine increase; Grit/sand texture; Matte/flatting; Pearlescent/iridescent; Pouring/cells; Texture/build (impasto); UV protection; Varnish/protection; Other
pl: Zamierzony efekt medium malarskiego: Adhezja/Wiązanie; Efekt pękania; Przyspieszacz schnięcia; Opóźniacz schnięcia; Rozlewność/Wygładzanie; Glazurowanie/Przezroczystość; Zwiększenie połysku; Tekstura żwiru/piasku; Matowienie; Perłowy/Iryzujący; Pouring/Tworzenie komórek; Tekstura/Struktura (impast); Ochrona przed promieniowaniem UV; Werniks/Zabezpieczenie; Inne
sv: Avsedd effekt för målningsmedium: Vidhäftning/bindning; Krakeleringseffekt; Torkaccelerator; Torktidsfördröjare; Flöde/utjämning; Lasyr/transparens; Ökad glans; Korn-/sandtextur; Matt/nedmattning; Pärlemor/iriserande; Pouring/celler; Textur/fyllighet (impasto); UV-skydd; Fernissa/skydd; Övrigt
lt-LT: Tapybos terpės numatytas efektas: Sukibimas; Trūkinėjimo efektas; Džiūvimo greitiklis; Džiūvimo lėtiklis; Takumas / išsilyginimas; Glazūravimas / skaidrumas; Blizgesio padidinimas; Smėlio tekstūra; Matinis; Perlamutrinis / švytintis; Liejimo / celių efektas; Tekstūros (impasto); UV apsauga; Lakas / apsauga; Kita
zh-CN: 颜料媒介的预期效果: 粘合/结合; 裂纹效果; 催干剂; 缓干剂; 流平; 罩染/透明; 增光/增亮; 砂砾/沙质纹理; 哑光/消光; 珠光/幻彩; 浇注/细胞效果; 纹理/堆叠（厚涂）; 防紫外线; 清漆/保护; 其他
es: Efecto previsto de la pintura: Adhesión/unión; Efecto craquelado; Acelerador de secado; Retardador de secado; Flujo/nivelación; Veladura/transparencia; Aumento de brillo; Textura de arena/grano; Mate/mateado; Nacarado/iridiscente; Vertido/celdas; Textura/volumen (empaste); Protección UV; Barniz/protección; Otro
pt-PT: Ênfase pretendida na pintura: Adesão/colagem; Efeito craquelê; Acelerador de secagem; Retardador de secagem; Fluxo/nivelamento; Veladura/transparência; Aumento do brilho/lustro; Textura de grão/areia; Mate/fosqueante; Nacarado/iridescente; Derrame/células; Textura/construção (impasto); Proteção UV; Verniz/proteção; Outro
it: Effetto desiderato del mezzo per pittura: Adesione/incollaggio; Effetto craquelé; Acceleratore di asciugatura; Ritardante di asciugatura; Scorrimento/livellamento; Velatura/trasparenza; Aumento brillantezza/lucentezza; Texture granulosa/sabbiosa; Opacizzante; Perlescente/iridescente; Colata/cellette; Texture/costruzione (impasto); Protezione UV; Vernice/protezione; Altro
ja: 絵具用媒体の意図された効果: 接着/結合; ひび割れ効果; 乾燥促進剤; 乾燥遅延剤; フロー/レベリング; グレージング/透明性; 光沢/ツヤ増加; 砂/砂利テクスチャ; マット/フラット化; パール/玉虫色; ポーリング/セル; テクスチャ/ビルド (インパスト); UV保護; ニス/保護; その他
nl: Verfmedium beoogd effect: Hechting/verlijming; Craquelé-effect; Droogversneller; Droogvertrager; Vloeibaarheid/egalisatie; Glaceren/transparantie; Glansverhoging; Korrel-/zandstructuur; Mat/matterend; Parelmoer/iriserend; Gieten/cellen; Textuur/opbouw (impasto); UV-bescherming; Vernis/bescherming; Overig
hu: Festőmédium szándékolt hatása: Tapadás/Kötés; Repesztő hatás; Száradásgyorsító; Száradáslassító; Folyás/Terülés; Lazúrozás/Átlátszóság; Fényesítés/Ragyogás fokozása; Szemcsés/Homokos textúra; Mattítás; Gyöngyház/Irizáló; Folyatás/Cellaképzés; Textúra/Vastagság (impasto); UV-védelem; Lakkozás/Védelem; Egyéb
ro-RO: Efect prevăzut al mediului pentru pictură: Aderență/Lipire; Efect de crăpare; Accelerator de uscare; Întârzietor de uscare; Curgere/Nivelare; Glazurare/Transparență; Creștere a luciului/strălucirii; Textură de granulație/nisip; Mat/Aplatizare; Perlat/Irizat; Turnare/Celule; Textură/Construcție (impasto); Protecție UV; Lac/Protecție; Altele
el: Μέσο βαφής που προορίζεται για το αποτέλεσμα: Πρόσφυση/συγκόλληση; Εφέ ρωγμών (crackle); Επιταχυντής στεγνώματος; Επιβραδυντής στεγνώματος; Ροή/επιπέδωση; Λουστράρισμα/διαφάνεια; Αύξηση γυαλάδας/λάμψης; Υφή άμμου/κόκκων; Ματ/μείωση γυαλάδας; Περλέ/ιριδίζον; Έκχυση/κυψέλες; Υφή/πάχος (impasto); Προστασία UV; Βερνίκι/προστασία; Άλλο
de: Beabsichtigte Wirkung des Malmittels: Haftung/Bindung; Krakelee-Effekt; Trocknungsbeschleuniger; Trocknungsverzögerer; Fließfähigkeit/Nivellierung; Lasur/Transparenz; Glanz/Schimmer-Verstärkung; Körnung/Sand-Textur; Mattierung; Perlmutt/Irisierend; Pouring/Zellen; Textur/Struktur (Impasto); UV-Schutz; Firnis/Schutz; Sonstige
fr: Effet recherché du médium de peinture: Adhérence/collage; Effet craquelé; Accélérateur de séchage; Retardateur de séchage; Fluidité/nivellement; Glaçage/transparence; Augmentation de la brillance; Texture granuleuse/sable; Mat/aplatissement; Nacré/iridescent; Coulage/cellules; Texture/épaisseur (empâtement); Protection UV; Vernis/protection; Autre
vi: Hiệu ứng mong muốn của chất liệu sơn: Bám dính/kết dính; Hiệu ứng rạn nứt; Chất gia tốc khô; Chất làm chậm khô; Lưu lượng/độ dàn phẳng; Tạo độ bóng/độ trong suốt; Tăng độ bóng/sáng; Kết cấu hạt/cát; Tạo độ mờ/làm xỉn; Ánh xà cừ/ánh kim; Đổ màu/tạo vân; Tạo kết cấu/tạo lớp (đắp màu impasto); Bảo vệ khỏi tia UV; Vecni/bảo vệ; Khác
bg-BG: Предназначен ефект на художествения медиум: Адхезия/свързване; Напукващ ефект (кракле); Ускорител на съхненето; Забавител на съхненето; Разлив/изравняване; Глазиране/прозрачност; Повишаване на блясъка/гланца; Текстура с песъчинки/пясък; Матиращ ефект; Перлен/ирисцентен ефект; Изливане/създаване на клетки; Текстура/обем (импасто); UV защита; Лак/защита; Друго
tr: Boya medyumunun amaçlanan etkisi: Yapıştırma/bağlama; Çatlatma efekti; Kuruma hızlandırıcı; Kuruma geciktirici; Akış/yayılma; Sırlama/şeffaflık; Parlaklık/ışıltı artırma; Kum dokusu; Matlaştırma/düzleştirme; Sedefli/yanardöner; Akıtma/hücre; Doku/yapı (impasto); UV koruması; Vernik/koruma; Diğer
cs: Zamýšlený efekt malířského média: Přilnavost/vázání; Krakelovací efekt; Urychlovač schnutí; Zpomalovač schnutí; Zlepšení toku / vyrovnání; Glazování / zvýšení průhlednosti; Zvýšení lesku; Získání drsné / pískové textury; Zmatnění; Perleťový / iridescentní efekt; Pouring / tvorba buněk; Získání textury / objemu (impasto); Ochrana proti UV záření; Zalakování/ochrana; Jiné
sl-SI: Predvideni učinek slikarskega medija: Oprijem/vezava; Učinek razpok (crackle); Pospeševalec sušenja; Upočasnjevalec sušenja; Pretok/izravnavanje; Glazura/prosojnost; Povečanje sijaja; Tekstura peska/zrn; Matiranje; Biserni/prelivajoči se učinek; Vlivanje/celice; Tekstura/volumen (impasto); Zaščita pred UV-žarki; Lakiranje/zaščita; Drugo
ko: 페인트 미디엄의 의도된 효과: 접착/결합; 크랙 효과; 건조 촉진제; 건조 지연제; 흐름/레벨링; 글레이징/투명도; 광택/윤기 증가; 모래/그릿 질감; 무광/플래팅; 진줏빛/무지갯빛; 푸어링/셀; 질감/빌드(임파스토); 자외선 차단; 바니시/보호; 기타
pt-BR: Medium de pintura efeito previsto: Adesão/colagem; Efeito craquelado; Acelerador de secagem; Retardador de secagem; Fluidez/nivelamento; Esmaltação/transparência; Aumento de brilho; Textura de areia/granulação; Fosco/opaco; Perolado/iridescente; Derramamento/células; Textura/espessura (empastamento); Proteção UV; Verniz/proteção; Outro
sk-SK: Zamýšľaný efekt maliarskeho média: Priľnavosť/lepenie; Krakelovací efekt; Urýchľovač schnutia; Spomaľovač schnutia; Rozlievanie/zarovnávanie; Glazúra/priesvitnosť; Zvýšenie lesku; Piesková textúra; Zmatnenie; Perleťový/dúhový efekt; Liatie/tvorba buniek; Textúra/objem (impasto); Ochrana pred UV žiarením; Lak/ochrana; Iné
nb: Tiltenkt effekt for malemedium: Vedheft/liming; Krakeleringseffekt; Tørkeakselerator; Tørkeforsinker; Flyt/utjevning; Lasering/transparens; Økt glans; Grus-/sandtekstur; Mattering; Perlemor/iriserende; Helling/celler; Tekstur/oppbygging (impasto); UV-beskyttelse; Lakk/beskyttelse; Annet
da: Malingsmediets tilsigtede effekt: Vedhæftning/binding; Krakeleringseffekt; Tørreaccelerator; Tørreretarder; Udjævning; Lasering/transparens; Øget glans/skin; Sandtekstur; Matterende; Perlemor/iriserende; Hældning/celler; Tekstur/opbygning (impasto); UV-beskyttelse; Lak/beskyttelse; Andet
ru: Предполагаемый эффект художественного медиума: Адгезия/склеивание; Эффект кракелюра; Ускоритель высыхания; Замедлитель высыхания; Текучесть/выравнивание; Лессировка/прозрачность; Увеличение глянца/блеска; Песчаная/зернистая текстура; Матирование; Перламутровый/радужный эффект; Заливка/создание ячеек; Текстура/объем (импасто); УФ-защита; Лакировка/защита; Другое
fi: Maalausvärin tarkoitettu vaikutus: Tarttuvuus/sidonta; Krakelointitehoste; Kuivumisen nopeuttaja; Kuivumisen hidastaja; Juoksevuus/tasoittuminen; Lasitus/läpinäkyvyys; Kiillon lisäys; Raemainen/hiekkainen tekstuuri; Matta/himmennys; Helmiäis-/irisoiva; Kaato/solut; Tekstuuri/rakennus (impasto); UV-suoja; Lakka/suoja; Muu
hr-HR: Željeni učinak medija boje: Prianjanje/spajanje; Efekt pucanja; Ubrzivač sušenja; Usporivač sušenja; Protok/niveliranje; Ostakljivanje/prozirnost; Povećanje sjaja/blistavosti; Tekstura pijeska/zrnaca; Mat/izravnavanje; Sedefasto/preljevno; Prelijevanje/stanice; Tekstura/struktura (impasto); UV zaštita; Lak/zaštita; Ostalo